Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3105
Jurisdiction; hearing; notice.

(1) The Nebraska court that approved the structured settlement agreement has jurisdiction over an application for authorization of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights. If a Nebraska court did not approve the structured settlement agreement, a person shall file an application under section 25-3104 in the district court for the county in which the payee resides.

(2) Not less than twenty days before the scheduled hearing on an application for authorization of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights under section 25-3104, the transferee shall file with the court and all interested parties a notice of the proposed transfer and the application for its authorization. The notice shall include:

(a) A copy of the transferee's application to the court;

(b) A copy of the transfer agreement;

(c) A copy of the disclosure statement required under section 25-3104; and

(d) Notice that an interested party is entitled to support, oppose, or otherwise respond to the transferee's application, either in person or by counsel, by submitting written comments to the court or by participating in the hearing, and notification of the time and place of the hearing and notification of the manner in which and the time by which written responses to the application must be filed in order to be considered by the court. Written responses to the application shall be filed within fifteen days after service of the transferee's notice.

Laws 2001, LB 55, § 5.